Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2665YH (2) 91 je/ko H.F. 717 Section 1. Section 17A.18, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. When the The grant, denial, or renewal of a license is 3 required by Constitution or statute to shall be preceded by 4 notice and opportunity for an evidentiary hearing, and the 5 provisions of this chapter concerning contested cases apply to 6 such action . 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 27D.1 Definitions. 8 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 9 requires: 10 1. âAgencyâ means the same as defined in section 17A.2. 11 2. âAgency actionâ means the same as defined in section 12 17A.2. 13 3. âContested caseâ means the same as defined in section 14 17A.2. 15 4. âLicenseâ means the same as defined in section 17A.2. 16 5. âLicensingâ means the same as defined in section 17A.2. 17 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 27D.2 Criteria for licenses ââ clear 18 and unambiguous language. 19 1. Any criterion in statute, rule, or other agency action 20 for licensing of a constitutionally protected activity shall be 21 specified in clear and unambiguous language. Any criterion in 22 violation of this section shall be void and unenforceable. 23 2. In determining whether language is clear and 24 unambiguous, a court shall not give any presumption in favor of 25 the validity of a criterion and shall not give any deference to 26 the view of an agency. 27 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 27D.3 Time period for license 28 applications. 29 When the time period for an agency to make a decision on an 30 application for a license is not specified in statute, the time 31 period shall be thirty days. An agency and an applicant for a 32 license may mutually agree to extend the thirty-day period. 33 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 27D.4 Contested cases on licensing 34 decisions ââ requirements. 35 -1- LSB 2665YH (2) 91 je/ko 1/ 6 H.F. 717 1. This section shall apply to a contested case proceeding 1 on a licensing decision by an agency. 2 a. The rules of civil procedure and the rules of evidence 3 shall apply. 4 b. All proceedings shall be conducted orally and shall be 5 recorded at the agencyâs expense either by mechanized means or 6 by certified shorthand reporters. 7 c. On application of a party or the agency, an 8 administrative law judge may permit a deposition of a witness 9 to be taken if the witness cannot be subpoenaed or is unable 10 to attend a hearing. Such a deposition shall be taken in the 11 manner and on the terms designated by the administrative law 12 judge. 13 d. The agency shall have the burden of persuasion. The 14 agency shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance of the 15 evidence unless a higher burden of proof is provided by law. 16 e. In addition to the grounds specified in section 17A.11, 17 subsection 2, any person serving or designated to serve 18 alone or with others as a presiding officer is subject to 19 disqualification for lack of technical expertise necessary to 20 effectively preside at a hearing. 21 2. Chapter 17A and other provisions of law relating to 22 contested case hearings shall apply to a contested case 23 proceeding on a licensing decision by an agency where such 24 requirements are not in conflict with this section. However, 25 section 17A.10 shall apply to all of the requirements provided 26 in this section. 27 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 27D.5 Judicial review of licensing 28 decisions. 29 1. In any action for judicial review of final agency action 30 on a licensing decision, the parties shall be entitled to a 31 speedy and public determination by the court. If requested 32 by a party to such an action within thirty days after a 33 petition for judicial review is filed, the court shall hold an 34 evidentiary hearing, including testimony and argument, to the 35 -2- LSB 2665YH (2) 91 je/ko 2/ 6 H.F. 717 extent necessary to make the determination. The court shall 1 review de novo all relevant questions of law, including the 2 interpretation of constitutional, statutory, and regulatory 3 provisions, unless the parties stipulate otherwise. On demand 4 of any party, a determination of facts shall be made by a jury. 5 2. Relevant and admissible exhibits and testimony that 6 were not received during contested case proceedings shall be 7 admitted by the court if compliant with the rules of evidence. 8 An objection that a party failed to make to evidence offered 9 during contested case proceedings shall be considered by the 10 court unless either of the following is true: 11 a. The exhibit, testimony, or objection was withheld for 12 purposes of delay, harassment, or other improper purpose. 13 b. Allowing admission of the exhibit or testimony or 14 consideration of the objection would cause substantial 15 prejudice to another party. 16 3. Section 17A.19 and other provisions of law relating to 17 judicial review of agency action shall apply to judicial review 18 of a licensing decision by an agency where such requirements 19 are not in conflict with this section. 20 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 27D.6 Conflicts with other provisions 21 of state law. 22 Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions 23 of this chapter apply notwithstanding any other provision of 24 state law to the contrary, including but not limited to chapter 25 17A. 26 Sec. 8. REPORT TO GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON IMPACT TO 27 AGENCIES. Any agency, as defined in section 17A.2, may submit 28 a report to the governor and the general assembly by January 29 1, 2026, regarding the impact of this Act on the functions of 30 the agency. The report may include recommendations, proposed 31 legislation, and any other relevant information. An agency may 32 consult with interested stakeholders when preparing the report. 33 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. 34 Sec. 10. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to agency action, 35 -3- LSB 2665YH (2) 91 je/ko 3/ 6 H.F. 717 as defined in section 17A.2, and judicial review thereof, 1 commenced on or after the effective date of this Act. 2